Massachusetts, session 194th, S622.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
Section 23, the following Section:- 
Section 23A. (a) The department, in order to protect public health and contain health care 
costs in the Commonwealth, shall create an assessment tool to quantify the health impacts and 
costs of emissions associated with grid electricity and delivered fuels, and the benefits of energy 
conservation, energy efficiency and renewable energy in the Commonwealth. 
(1) The assessment tool shall separately quantify health impacts and costs of emissions to 
environmental justice populations, the MassHealth program, community hospitals, the state 
budget and public health. 

of 3 10  (2) In creating the assessment tool, the department shall draw upon relevant agency 
expertise and resources, including but not be limited to, the Center for Health Information and 
Analysis, the Executive Office of Health and Human Services and its MassHealth program, and 
the Division of Energy Resources.  
(3) In the design and operation of its assessment tool the department shall build upon 
existing health impacts assessment tools and analyses, including but not be limited to the health 
and health cost impacts used in the US Environmental Protection Agency's Clean Power Plan, 
and Co-Benefits Risk Assessment, as well as Health Care Without Harm’s Healthcare Energy 
Impact Calculator.   
(4)The assessment tool created by the department shall incorporate and analyze factors 
that have an impact on health, including but not be limited to, health impacts and costs due to 
particulate matter < 2.5 microns, sulfur oxides, nitrogen oxides, carbon, carbon dioxide, and 
mercury emissions from energy sources.   
(5) The assessment tool created by the department shall generate a breakdown of how the 
analyzed factors will impact specific measures of health status, including but not be limited to, 
health impacts costs and savings from premature death, cardiovascular events or injury, chronic 
bronchitis, asthma, respiratory symptoms, hospital admissions, restricted activity days, lost 
school and work days, and developmental/neurological problems, or, as applicable, their avoided 
impacts and cost savings resulting from energy conservation, energy efficiency and renewable 
energy in the Commonwealth. 
(b) The department shall update the tool every 3 years, or as needed, to maintain its 
accuracy. Beginning not later than 24 months after the effective date of this act, any new or 

of 3 32 revised policy, regulation, or program of the Commonwealth, or any ruling or adjudication by an 
agency of the Commonwealth that impacts polluting emissions, especially those for energy, 
buildings, transportation and waste, shall explicitly factor in the tool's output reflecting the 
action's health incidents, health costs or avoided impact's savings. 
SECTION 2.  Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, not later than 
12 months after the effective date of this act, the Department of Public Health shall submit the 
assessment tool, created pursuant to section 23A of chapter 111, and explanatory materials on its 
use to the Clerks of the Senate and the House, the Secretary of the Executive Office of Health 
and Human Services, and the Secretary of the Executive Office of Energy and Environmental 
Affairs.